District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.06

Suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew registration.

(a)

The Mayor may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a registration for conduct that would have justified denial of registration under § 47-2887.05(b).

(b)

The Mayor may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a certificate of registration or licensure only after proper notice and an opportunity for a hearing. Chapter 5 of Title 2 applies to this part.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.